Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Yosemite National Park Lead Agency: National Park Service Summary of Public Comments and Responses Public Comments and Responses Introduction Cascades Diversion Dam is a timber crib dam constructed in 1917 to divert the flow of the main stem of the Merced Wild and Scenic River into a hydroelectric generating facility.
The hydroelectric facility was taken off line in 1985 and 1986 because it was deteriorated and outdated.
Turbines and other equipment were removed from the powerhouse, and the majority of the penstock was removed.
Some elements of the former hydroelectric generating facility still remain, including abutments that flank the dam, an intake structure, a screenhouse, 300 feet of concrete penstock (which historically conveyed water from the dam to the powerhouse), the powerhouse, and the transmission lines.
Cascades Diversion Dam impedes flow of the Merced Wild and Scenic River in this area.
In addition, Cascades Diversion Dam is classified as a high-hazard structure.
It is in unsatisfactory condition due to flood damage sustained in 1997 and to continuing deterioration associated with age.
Due to the threat to public health and safety and to natural resources in the Merced Wild and Scenic River corridor, the dam needs to be removed before further deterioration or total dam failure occurs.
Cascades Diversion Dam and intake structure with screens were determined to be eligible for nomination to the National Register of Historic Places in 1982.
The National Park Service has completed all cultural resource compliance procedures required under the National Historic Preservation Act for removal of the dam and associated features.
This document contains the Summary of Public Comments for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment.
This document also includes the responses to public comments to the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment.
Comment Analysis Process
The letters, emails, and faxes represented in this report were analyzed using the National Park Service's adaptation of a process developed by the United States Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, Washington Office Ecosystem Management Staff, Content Analysis Team.
This process has been used over the last seven years for public comment on Yosemite National Park planning efforts including the 1992 Draft Yosemite Valley Housing Plan, the 1996 Addendum to the Draft Yosemite Valley Housing Plan, the 1997 Draft Yosemite Lodge Concept Plan, the Valley Implementation Plan, the 2000 Merced Wild and Scenic River Comprehensive Management Plan, and the 2000 Yosemite Valley Plan.
The comment analysis process includes three main components: a coding structure, a comment database, and this narrative summary.
Initially, a coding structure is developed to help sort comments into logical groups by topics.
Code categories are derived from an analysis of the range of topics covered in relevant present and past planning documents, National Park Service legal guidance, and letters themselves.
The object of these codes is to allow for quick access to comments on specific topics.
The coding structure used was inclusive rather than restrictive--an attempt was made to capture all comments.
The second phase of the analysis involves the assignment of codes to statements made by the public in its letters, faxes, and emails.
For each comment in a piece of correspondence, codes are assigned by one staff person, validated by another, and then entered into a database as verbatim quotes from actual public statements.
The database, in turn, is used to help construct this narrative summary.
The third phase includes the identification of statements of public concern and the preparation of this narrative.
Statements of public concern are identified throughout the coding and writing process and are derived from and supported by quotes from original letters.
These public concerns attempt to present common themes identified from comments in a statement that captures the action the public feels the National Park Service should undertake.
Public concerns are derived directly from letters and through a review of the database.
Each is worded to give decision-makers a clear sense of the public's concerns.
Statements of concern are not intended to replace actual comments or sample statements.
Rather they can help guide the reader to comments relating to the specific topic in which they are interested.
All identified public concerns, whether supported by the comments of one person or many, are included.
Although it is important to note that the concerns presented in this document are numerous and exhaustive in content, public concerns are not intended to stand alone.
They should instead be considered as one means of accessing information contained in original letters and the coded comment database.
All comments and concerns are considered, whether presented by numerous people or an individual.
Emphasis in this process is on the content of the comment rather than the number of people who agree with it.
This is not a vote-counting process and no effort has been made to tabulate the number of people for or against a certain aspect of a specific planning topic.
This information can be derived manually from the database if desired.
Although the comment analysis process used attempts to capture the full range of public concerns, this summary should be used with caution.
Comments from people who chose to respond do not necessarily represent the sentiments of the entire public.
All comments are treated equally and are not weighted by number, organizational affiliation, or other status of respondents.
For more information, the reader should refer to the database reports prepared as part of this process and the original letters available in the Planning and Compliance Office, Yosemite National Park, P.O. Box 577, Yosemite National Park, California 95389.
How to Use This Document
This Comment Analysis Summary is divided into sections.
The first section includes general comments on the planning process and National Park Service policies.
The next section covers comments on the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project alternatives.
The next sections analyze comments regarding general Park natural resources, ecosystem processes, water resources, and vegetation (not rare, threatened, or endangered).
The next section addresses comments regarding cultural resources.
The final sections address comments regarding Park social resources, including recreation, visitor services, transportation, and park operations.
Each section includes one or more statements of public concern.
These public concerns attempt to present common themes identified from comment in a statement that captures what action the public feels the National Park Service should undertake.
(Note: Because all public concerns are presented, oftentimes these statements may offer contradictory direction.)
Each public concern is, in turn, followed by supporting quotes from public comment referenced to original letters.
Each supporting quote is followed by an attribute which identifies the number assigned to the original letter it came from, whether the comment was made by an individual or an organization, a general description of the organization type, and a reference to the letter number and the comment number within the letter.
This information appears as a parenthetical clause in the following format: organization or individual, city and state of letter - relevant planning effort - letter number.
For example, "(Individual, Hanford, CA - #8-1)" is a letter from an individual in Hanford, CA and assigned the letter number 8; the supporting quote is from the first coded comment in the letter.
Finally, each public concern statement, and its supporting quotes, is followed by the National Park Service Response.
Note that minor technical comments are corrected in the appropriate document or errata sheet and do not receive either a public concern statement or National Park Service response in this report.
Often public comments are submitted in the name of more than one person.
In these cases, each signature or the total number of signatures is tracked in the analysis process.
Table 1 offers three different ways of looking at how many people submitted input and how many comments they offered during the public comment period for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment.
The first column, titled "Number of Responses," displays the total number of pieces of input (letters, emails, faxes, petitions, comments forms).
The second column reports the number of signatures tabulated from all responses, including petitions.
This number provides the most accurate gauge of how many people, whether individually or as co-signatories to a letter, offered input on each Yosemite planning effort.
The third column displays the number of comments coded, categorized, and entered into the comment analysis database.
Although there is no correlation between the numbers presented in each column of this table, the number of comments relative to the number of responses for a given planning effort can give readers some indication of the level of detail in public involvement.
Planning Process and Policy
3.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should remove the O'Shaughnessy dam forming Hetch Hetchy Reservoir.
"This is to express my opinion that the removal of the Hetch Hetchy dam is highly advisable.
I have flown across Hetch Hethcy dam area and it is a beautiful area.
Even John Muir expressed his opinion that Hetch Hetchy was even more beautiful than Yosemite."
(Individual, Mammoth Lakes, CA. #21-1)
Response: Removal of Hetch Hetchy Dam is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for removal of other dams.
Any plan to remove Hetch Hetchy or other dams would be considered a specific project and would be evaluated in a separate implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act or California Environmental Quality Act, as appropriate.
7.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not implement proposed actions in the Lower Yosemite Fall parking lot.
"I disagree with the project in the parking lot of Yosemite Falls.
I consider it a waste of funds that could have been put to better use, i.e. restoring the aforementioned [Upper and Lower River] campgrounds."
(Individual, Castro Valley, CA. #1-4)
Response: The Lower Yosemite Fall Project is currently taking place and was evaluated in a separate environmental assessment consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act.
Both the Lower Yosemite Fall Project and the ecological restoration of Upper and Lower River Campgrounds are projects that are called for and approved in the Yosemite Valley Plan.
The National Park Service intends to implement the actions called for in the Yosemite Valley Plan in a phased approach.
10.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should undertake the appropriate environmental review and compliance before finalizing any new agreements for sewer hookups to the Yosemite Motels development in El Portal.
"[Regarding] the "Yosemite Motels Expansion" mentioned on page E-10: The Park provides sewer service to this motel complex under some type of agreement.
In order for the complex to expand it has to obtain a new agreement from the Park for additional sewer service.
I trust the Park is going through the appropriate environmental review and compliance with the Comprehensive Management Plan for the Merced Wild and Scenic river before finalizing any new agreement.
I for one feel the Park should not be aiding in the further degredation of this area that lies directly adjacent to the Merced Wild and Scenic River."
(Individual, Email.
#10-8)
Response: Sewer service to be included in the Yosemite Motels Expansion is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for a project at Yosemite Motels.
Any plan to improve or expand the Yosemite Motels sewer service would be considered a specific project and would be evaluated in a separate implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act and/or California Environmental Quality Act, as appropriate.
16.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should present more technical data in environmental impact disclosure documents.
"It is unacceptable for the preparers of a disclosure document to presume that all public reviewers will be technologically illiterate."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-25)
Response: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment provides technical information at a level that is sufficient to accurately assess and disclose the environmental impacts of proposed actions.
More detailed technical data and studies are referenced in the Environmental Assessment, and are thereby incorporated by reference.
Technical data and studies referenced in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are on file at Yosemite National Park and are included in the Administrative Record for the project.
4.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal project should clarify whether water was flowing over the dam or through the intake structure in October 2002.
"We find the Figures II-1, II-3, and II-6 puzzling.
The figures show water below the dam, but the upstream face of the dam appears to be dry.
Was the river so low in October 2002 that there was no flow over the dam? Did the entire river flow pass through the `Intake Structure'?" (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-19)
Response: Merced River flow is typically lowest (less than 200 cubic feet per second) from September through November and water levels during October 2002, as shown on Figures II-1, II-2 and II-3, are consistent with typical low water flows during that period.
As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment (Chapter III, Affected Environment, Alluvial Processes), a rock and sediment island is located upstream from the dam, including material present before the dam was constructed.
The presence of the island immediately upstream from the dam diverts water to the river-right and river-left banks of the Merced River during lower flow periods, as shown in Figure II-1 and photographs included in the Environmental Assessment.
The center portion of the impoundment immediately upstream from the dam was dry during the referenced low flow period.
During low flow periods, water flow passes through the concrete lined sluiceway on the river-left or through the intake structure on the river-right, or seeps through the timber cribs.
Water seepage through the timber cribs occurs extensively.
5.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should clarify whether the project will improve downstream conditions.
"[Yosemite Area Audubon] agrees that the dam is an `unnatural obstruction' on the Merced River.
The removal project is said to be `consistent' with the CMP and the YVP, both of which authorize significant additional `unnatural development' within the Wild and Scenic River Corridor. ...
Since the discontinuance of power generation, the river hydrology has had an opportunity to adjust to the flow regimes with the existence of the dam.
There has never been a time following shutdown of the powerhouse when there was not flow in the river below the dam.
Therefore, the impoundment has had no effect on the hydrology of that segment; nor--except for the materials that may be deposited during and following dam removal--will removal of the dam alter the downstream hydrology.
So long as water flows continuously over the dam, the flow rate below the dam will equal the flow into the impoundment--and this will be unchanged following dam removal. ...
Therefore, removal of the dam will accomplish the alleged Purpose `to restore the river's natural free-flowing condition' only in the portion occupied by the impoundment pool (approximately 500 feet)."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-6)
Response: As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment (Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences, Alternative 1 - No Action, Hydrology, Floodplains, and Water Quality), a dam, like any fixed structure in a river, can alter flow dynamics and result in localized morphologic changes to the bed and banks of the river.
We agree that the volume of water passing through the area will not change as a result of dam removal, but many other hydrologic features related to free flow of the river would be restored in the area.
Cascades Diversion Dam constricts the floodplain of the Merced River in the immediate area of the dam, alters hydrologic flows, widens the river channel (to approximately twice its natural width, and impedes free-flow and fluvial processes (e.g., sediment transport and water flow transit time).
While restoration of the river's natural free-flowing condition throughout the entire reach of the Merced Wild and Scenic River is beyond the scope of this project, removal of Cascades Diversion Dam as described in Alternatives 2 and 3 of the Environmental Assessment would restore the river's natural free-flowing condition in the vicinity of the dam and the impoundment area, thereby meeting the Purpose of the project.
Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam as described in Alternatives 2 and 3 of the Environmental Assessment would further fulfill the Purpose of the project by removing an unnatural obstruction on the Merced River.
9.
Public Concern: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal project should not widen the El Portal Road along the length of the project area.
"[Friends of Yosemite Valley] has pointed out and documented in numerous public comments and other correspondence with the NPS...that the NPS plans for the El Portal Road widening in Yosemite National Park and removal of Cascades Dam have been inappropriately linked.
The two action alternatives in the current plan under review continue this linkage.
(II-21).
Although the plan claims the projects are distinct, the document itself demonstrates their linkage.
(Figures II-1, II-2, II-6) These drawings clearly demonstrate that areas designated as, "Limit of Bioengineered Slope Protection" will be used as rip-rap to facilitate widening of the existing footprint of the El Portal Road INTO the Merced River.
(The Merced River's footprint is artificially narrowed in these drawings giving an incorrect impression of its bed and banks).
It is a sad day for the National Park Service when "removal" of a dam is used to facilitate an inappropriate and unnecessary widening of an existing road into one of the most well-know and revered Wild and Scenic Rivers in the USA."
(Conservation Organization, Email.
#22-2)
Response: Page II-21 of the Environmental Assessment (cited by Commentor) describes an Alternative that was considered but dismissed that would combine the removal of Cascades Diversion Dam with the Final Phase of the El Portal Road Improvement Project.
As indicated on page I-8 of the Environmental Assessment, the National Park Service intends to remove Cascades Diversion Dam, let natural processes prevail through this reach of the Merced River, and allow the river to stabilize.
The current project does not involve widening or realigning El Portal Road.
If the National Park Service later decides to proceed with the El Portal Road Improvement Project - Cascades Dam to Pohono Bridge, potential future designs will need to comply with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act as well as other legislation and park planning documents.
Potential future improvement of El Portal Road is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
Although the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project is completely distinct from this potential future action, the road improvement project is included in the cumulative impact analysis of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment because it is a reasonably foreseeable future project.
Environmental Assessment Figure II-6 cited by the commenter shows the area of the bioenginnered bank stabilization system from an aerial prospective.
The post-project appearance of the bioenginnered bank is provided in greater detail in Figure II-5.
As shown on Figure II-5 and pages II-12 through II-15 (Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup), the bioengineered slope protection system would result in a sloped embankment with trees, native vegetation, and boulders that would be designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks to the extent possible.
As demonstrated on Environmental Assessment Figure II-5, the slope of Merced River bank following project completion would not result in the widening of El Portal Road, and in fact, Figure II-5 shows the road remaining in its current location.
The bioengineered slope protection system is included as part of the project because the intake structure is located at a transition area between two different types of embankment slopes (see Environmental Assessment Figure II-5).
The riverbank in this area, and the existing El Portal Road and utilities within the roadway, would be particularly susceptible to erosion following dam removal without stabilization.
The proposed slope protection would enable water flow to transition through upstream and downstream embankments while protecting the riverbanks.
The bioengineered slope protection would include native river rock/boulders and native vegetation and trees extracted prior to or during dam removal but would not include riprap.
Environmental Assessment Figures II-1, II-2, and II-6 accurately represent the Merced River conditions, including water levels, banks, and islands, in October 2002, when a complete survey of the project area was conducted by the U.S. Department of Transportation, Federal Highway Administration.
11.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should clarify if the methodologies and criteria section of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project environmental assessment will be used for evaluating other projects and the type of comments requested on this section.
"Included in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are a number of methodologies and evaluation criteria used in determining the environmental impacts of this project.
Our understanding is that these criteria and methodologies will be used in subsequent projects.
In the context of this particular project, these methods and criteria seem to be comprehensive; however, because they are presented as they relate to this specific project, our Center is unable to comment on these methodologies and criteria in general.
If the Park Service wanted comments specifically relating to these methodologies or criteria, it would be easier to review more general versions not directed at any specific project."
(Conservation Organization, Twain Harte, CA. #13-2)
Response: The methodologies and assumptions included in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment (Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences, Methodologies) were prepared specifically for the proposed project.
Preparation and review of methodologies and criteria to be used for other National Park Service projects is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives, or analysis of those alternatives, pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
12.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not pursue the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project at this time.
"The issuance of the DEA for this project is premature, inasmuch as the dam removal is under injunction, and the court decision--that the CMP for the Merced River has fulfilled the requirements of the WSRA and NEPA--is currently under appeal in the Fifth District Court."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-3)
Response: The National Park Service is able to proceed with removal of Cascades Division Dam due to the favorable decision of Friends of Yosemite Valley v. Norton 194 F. Supp. 2d 1068 (E.D. Cal. 2002), in which the U.S. District Court found that the National Park Service had prepared a valid and comprehensive management plan for the river.
Although this decision was appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, the National Park Service is legally able to move forward with the proposed removal of Cascades Diversion Dam because this project is not included in the range of issues appealed to the federal court.
Nevertheless, the National Park Service has notified the District Court of the intent to remove the dam and the National Park Service would comply with any instructions from the District Court regarding this project.
18.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should consult with the American Indian Council of Mariposa County when the restoration process for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project begins.
"When the restoration process begins the American Indian Council would like to be consulted on what plant species are desired in area of project."
(Tribal Organization, Mariposa, CA. #18-5)
Response: In response to this comment, Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter II, Alternatives, Mitigation Measures Common to All Action Alternatives has been revised to include the requested consultation.
The revised text is included in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Finding of No Significant Impact, Addenda to the Environmental Assessment.
28.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should clarify the limit of slope protection in the area of the removed screen structure.
"Figure II-3 shows the limit of the of slope protection with a dashed line.
Shouldn't the dashed line be contiguous at the upper edge of the slope protection in the area of the removed screen structure? There is a line at the lower edge of the slope but not the upper edge in this location."
(Individual, Email.
#10-3)
Response: In response to this comment, Figure II-3 of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment has been revised as suggested.
The revised text is included in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Finding of No Significant Impact, Addenda to the Environmental Assessment.
45.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project cumulative impacts analysis should include installation of flush toilets at Cascades and vault toilets at the dam intersection and along the river between there and Pohono Bridge.
"When we did the original EA for the entire road reconstruction we included compliance for the installation of flush toilets at Cascades and vault toilets at the dam intersection and another along the river between Pohono and BOF Rd. intersection.
I do not expect to see these toilets to be part of the road reconstruction project but they still are needed and may be included in the cumulative impacts analysis section?" (Individual, Email.
#10-7)
Response: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment description of the El Portal Road Improvement Project - Cascades Diversion Dam to Pohono Bridge (Appendix E, Projects Included in the Cumulative Impacts Analysis) generally describes the components that could be included in this potential future project.
Public improvements are included as a potential component of this project.
Detailed description of project specific components is premature at this time and is beyond the scope of this project.
8.
Public Concern: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should maintain the separation between the removal of the Cascades diversion dam and the improvement of El Portal Road between the diversion dam and Pohono Bridge.
"The separation between the Cascades Project from the El Portal Road Improvement Project--Cascades Diversion Dam to Pohono Bridge project we affirm as sound planning."
(Conservation Organization, Clovis, CA. #4-2)
Response: This comment is noted.
The National Park Service intends to continue to address the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project and the improvement of El Portal Road as distinct proje cts.
13.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should comply with the Wild and Scenic River Act and protect the Merced Wild and Scenic River.
"Since the National Park Service started their series of planning documents and predominately development projects post 1997, the Friends of Yosemite Valley has asked NPS numerous times over many years both written public comments and at numerous meetings with the National Park Service representatives to comply with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act and truly protect the Merced River and its Outstandingly Remarkable Values."
(Conservation Organization, Email.
#22-1)
Response: This comment is noted.
Compliance with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act is a key responsibility of the National Park Service and is the primary Purpose of the proposed action (see Chapter II, Purpose and Need of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project).
The proposed action fully complies with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, as described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter V, Merced Wild and Scenic River.
17.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should consult with the American Indian Council of Mariposa County when preparing environmental compliance documents.
"We are pleased to note (even though a legal requirement) the inclusion of the American Indian Council of Mariposa Country, Inc. in the planning and implementation process."
(Conservation Organization, Clovis, CA. #4-3)
Response: The National Park Service consults with culturally associated Indian tribes according to stipulations of the Programmatic Agreement and specific agreements, such as the 1999 agreement between the National Park Service, Yosemite National Park, and the American Indian Council of Mariposa County, Inc. for Conducting Traditional Activities.
Such consultation is critical to development of appropriate mitigating strategies for effects to ethnographic resources.
Such strategies include identification of and assistance in providing access to alternative resource gathering areas, continuing to provide access to traditional use or spiritual areas, and screening new development from traditional use areas.
Alternatives
24.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should construct new dams on the Merced River and elsewhere as profitable sources of power.
"Construct new dams here or elsewhere to generate profitable power sources."
(Individual, Long Beach, CA. #16-1)
Response: Construction of a new dam within the Cascades Diversion Dam project area would be similar to restoration of Cascades Diversion Dam and Hydroelectric Generating Facility, as described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter II, Alternatives, Alternatives Considered but Dismissed.
As described, repair of Cascades Diversion Dam and the entire hydroelectric generating facility to fully functioning capacity would require extensive construction activities and would be inconsistent with the Purpose of the project to remove an unnatural obstruction on the Merced River and to restore the river's free-flowing condition, consistent with the Merced River Plan and Yosemite Valley Plan.
Construction of a new dam in a location outside the Cascades Diversion Dam project area is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for construction of other dams.
Any plan to construct a new dam would be considered a specific project and would be evaluated in a separate implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act or California Environmental Quality Act, as appropriate.
6.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not implement either Alternative 2 or Alternative 3.
"This project should not go forward as planned in Alt. 2 or 3.
The wood on the dam is slowly decaying and moving down river on its own.
In essence, the river is removing the dam.
This project should not create further negative impacts to the river on top of the impacts of building the dam and reinforcing/rip-rapping the banks in the first place."
(Conservation Organization, Email.
22-4)
"Generally, Yosemite Area Audubon (YAA) supports dam removal projects on Wild and Scenic Rivers, provided they are accomplished in full compliance with the provisions of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (WSRA) and without adverse effects to the hydrologic functions of the river and the riparian biotic communities.
YAA cannot support this project because...the DEA provides no information whereby a reviewer can confirm that NPS has fulfilled the `Prior Requirement' embodied in the Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation, in compliance with section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act...and its implementing regulations...."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-2)
"Generally, Yosemite Area Audubon (YAA) supports dam removal projects on Wild and Scenic Rivers, provided they are accomplished in full compliance with the provisions of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (WSRA) and without adverse effects to the hydrologic functions of the river and the riparian biotic communities.
YAA cannot support this project because the DEA fails to present adequate analysis that would assure compliance and protection of Outstandingly Remarkable Values (ORVs) of the River and proposes to apply `Rip Rap' to the rive bank upstream of the Dam in violation of the WSRA."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-1)
"Unless it can be more persuasively demonstrated that removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam will provide significant ecological benefits to the Wild and Scenic Merced River, [Yosemite Area Audubon] must oppose the project as proposed in either Alternative II or III."
Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-22)
Response: Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would not be removed.
The dam would continue to degrade and would eventually fail.
Dam failure would likely occur during high-flow conditions, releasing large debris and sediments to the river and banks.
In addition, continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in the release of large debris.
Dam debris could damage natural, cultural, and scenic resources as well as recreation opportunities and park facilities downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
In addition, debris removal activities could further damage resources.
While dam removal under the proposed action would be associated with potential impacts to Park resources, the impact area would be restricted to the project area (Cascades Diversion Dam and the impoundment area), and would be reduced by mitigation measures that would be applied during project implementation and that are incorporated into the proposed action.
The proposed action also includes a bioengineered bank stabilization system that would be installed to protect the riverbank from erosion upstream and downstream of the removed dam, and at the below-grade intake structure that would remain following dam removal.
As an alternative to riprap, a bioengineered bank stabilization system would be installed to protect the river-right bank.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter VI, Consultation and Coordination includes a summary of the Agency Consultation conducted with the California State Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation.
This section also describes actions the National Park Service has undertaken in compliance with the 1986 Memorandum of Understanding with the California State Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation and Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, as amended.
Agency consultation referenced in the Environmental Assessment is on file at Yosemite National Park and is included in the Administrative Record for the project.
The Administrative Record includes a letter from the Fresno Metropolitan Museum (dated April 28, 2003) stating that the equipment required under the Memorandum of Understanding was taken into possession by the Fresno Metropolitan in August of 1987.
A copy of the letter is attached to this Summary of Comments and Responses report.
Compliance with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act is a key responsibility of the National Park Service and is the primary Purpose of the proposed action (see Chapter II, Purpose and Need of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment).
The proposed action fully complies with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, as described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter V, Merced Wild and Scenic River.
19.
Public Concern: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should remove the dam, make a viewing platform and repave the parking area on the North side of the El Portal Road.
"The mix of detail project elements between Alternative 2 and 3 is, in my opinion, not proper.
I believe that the correct mix of elements should be to remove the dam, make a viewing platform and repave the parking area on the North side of the El Portal Road.
The argument that the viewing structure is a potential rock fall hazard to visitors and the platform is ludicrous.
The entire Yosemite Valley is a potential rock fall hazard to people and development.
Remove the dam.
Build a viewing platform.
Retain and repave the northside parking area.
But also provide some parking adjacent to the viewing platform."
(Individual, Email.
#3-2)
Response: This comment expressed a preference for a certain alternative, with slight modifications.
As directed by the National Environmental Policy Act, the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment considers a range of alternatives.
The alternatives provide a range of frameworks for managing the removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam, balancing natural and cultural resource preservation with visitor use to varying degrees.
Under Alternative 3, the parking area north of El Portal Road would be removed in order to reduce potential hazards to pedestrians crossing El Portal Road at the El Portal Road/Big Oak Flat Road intersection to access the viewing platform included under Alternative 3.
Under Alternative 3, parking adjacent to the viewing platform would be provided at the existing vehicle turnout.
22.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should implement Alternative 3 of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project and remove the dam.
"I vote for Alternative 3: Partial dam removal: as a river viewing platform [it would be] excellent for park visitors (and the river and animals and birds won't mind)!" (Individual, Le Grand, CA. #11-1)
"In reading about the three alternatives for this project the need for removal of the dam is not questioned.
The use of the area after the removal is.
A free-flowing river is a great resource but here we have an opportunity to continue a use all ready established.
In the fact sheet your own people observed the following: `The recreational value of the Cascades Diversion Dam site is also an important resource concern.
Located...a popular site when visitors entering the Valley enjoy opportunities for photography, fishing and nature study.'
The use of this concrete area, on the El Portal roadside, as the start of an interpretive area for the many visitors who already use this site just seems to be a good use of this site.
The view up and down the river, of the valley and the restoration of the flood plain and other low lying areas, within this site, just make using this area of great importance.
The concrete of the abutments and the water intake can easily be made to look like granite rocks in this area.
With proper planning for parking and interpretive signing the educational possibilities are endless.
My vote is for your third alternative and a interpretive use of this area."
(Individual, Yuba City, CA. #19-1)
Response: Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 3 would remove the dam and retain the intake structure for use as a river-viewing platform.
The parking area to the north of the dam would be removed and the area restored to natural conditions.
Parking for the river-viewing platform would be located to the west of the intake structure, adjacent to El Portal Road.
Removal of the parking area to the north of the dam would be required to eliminate potential traffic conflicts between vehicles passing through the El Portal Road / Big Oak Flat Road intersection and sightseers crossing El Portal Road to access the platform.
In addition, under Alternative 3, the intake structure would remain within the bed and banks of the Merced Wild and Scenic River.
Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2 was identified as the environmentally preferable alternative because, among the alternatives considered in detail, it most fully satisfies the national environmental policy goals stated in Section 101 of the National Environmental Policy Act.
Alternative 2 would provide a high level of protection of natural and downstream cultural resources while concurrently attaining the widest range of beneficial uses of the environment without degradation, reducing risks to public health and safety, and providing aesthetically pleasing surroundings.
Following implementation of Alternative 2, and loss of the intake structure as an informal river-viewing platform, scenic views and recreational sightseeing opportunities of the Merced River and dramatic rock formations in the area could still be observed from the vehicle turnout west of the dam along El Portal Road and from other nearby viewing platforms.
Alternative 3 would be less sensitive than Alternative 2 to provisions of Section 101 of the National Environmental Policy Act because free flow would remain affected in the immediate area of the intake structure (retained as a viewing platform); therefore, Alternative 3 would not enhance the integrity of wetland and aquatic resources in the area to the same degree as Alternative 2.
The health and safety of park visitors would not be protected to the same degree as under Alternative 2, due to continued vehicle safety hazards.
Further, the river-viewing platform (and visitors using the platform) would be exposed to long-term geologic hazards.
Removal of the parking area to the north of the dam would eliminate a carpool/recreation access point in the project vicinity.
23.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should analyze the impacts of a fourth alternative, removing only the deteriorating timber construction of the dam and leaving the structure of the dam in place.
"CalTrans has little preference over the three stated alternatives, but would state a fourth alternative to remove only the deteriorating timber construction of the dam.
This would be viable and cost effective.
Unless there is a detailed analysis (of which none one present) that the concrete structure of the dam would fail, CalTrans sees no evidence that total failure would occur."
(State Agency, Stockton, CA. 14-5)
"Removal, partially or fully, of the Cascades Dam and its appurtenances does not appear to pose a significant impact to the flows of the river and therefore no significant impacts should be experienced to any downstream structures.
Aside from the deteriorating timbers, the majority of the dam looks very stable and of little chance of total collapse or failure.
Removal would appear mainly for aesthetics rather than danger of eminent failure of this structure.
At a minimum, the deteriorated timbers could be removed [with] minimal effort and cost and the majority of Cascades Dam Structure could remain in place.
This should be a viable alternative and should be addressed with a proper analysis."
(State Agency, Stockton, CA. #14-1)
Response: Public comment expressed the idea that the deteriorated timbers should be removed and that the remainder of the dam should be allowed to remain rather than be removed.
Cascades Diversion Dam is classified as a high-hazard structure.
It is in unsatisfactory condition due to flood damage sustained in 1997 and continued deterioration associated with age.
Damage to the dam structure extends beyond degradation of the timber cribs, cracks have developed in the concrete facing as well.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would continue to degrade and would eventually fail.
Dam failure would likely occur during high-flow conditions, releasing large debris and sediments to the river and banks.
In addition, continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in the release of large debris.
Dam debris could damage natural, cultural, and scenic resources as well as recreation opportunities and park facilities downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
In addition, debris removal activities could further damage resources.
An alternative that would only remove damaged concrete timbers would be similar to Alternative 1, No Action, as described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter II, Alternatives.
As directed by the National Environmental Policy Act, the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment considers a range of alternatives.
The alternatives provide a range of frameworks for managing the removal of Cascades Diversion Dam, balancing natural and cultural resource preservation with visitor use to varying degrees.
Also, the purpose of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project is to remove an unnatural obstruction on the Merced River and to restore the river's free-flowing condition.
48.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should implement Alternative 1, No Action.
"The No Action Alternative calls for no placement of rip/rap on the River bank and this is the most persuasive argument for opposing the proposed dam removal."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-16)
Response: The comment correctly indicates that the No Action Alternative would not include placement of riprap on the banks of the Merced River.
In addition, use of riprap is not proposed under Alternatives 2 or 3 either.
As an alternative to riprap, a bioengineered bank stabilization system would be constructed of natural river boulders and native vegetation, designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would continue to degrade and would eventually fail.
Dam failure would likely occur during high-flow conditions, releasing large debris and sediments to the river and banks.
In addition, continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in the release of large debris.
Dam debris could damage natural, cultural, and scenic resources as well as recreation opportunities and park facilities downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
In addition, debris removal activities could further damage resources.
As shown on Environmental Assessment Figure II-5 and pages II-12 through II-15 (Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup), the bioengineered slope protection system would result in a sloped embankment with trees, native vegetation, and boulders that would be designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks to the extent possible.
As demonstrated on Environmental Assessment Figure II-5, the slope of Merced River banks following project completion would not facilitate widening of El Portal Road.
The bioengineered slope projection system is included as part of the project because the intake structure is located at a transition area between two different types of embankment slopes (see Environmental Assessment Figure II-5).
The riverbank (and El Portal Road and utilities within the roadway) in this area would be particularly susceptible to erosion following dam removal without stabilization.
The proposed slope protection would enable water flow to transition through upstream and downstream embankments while protecting the riverbanks.
The bioengineered slope protection would include native river rock/boulders extracted during dam removal but would not include riprap.
2.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should adopt Alternative 2 of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project and remove the dam from the Merced River.
"Our Center agrees with the Park Service that Alternative 2, Complete Dam Removal, will have the greatest benefits both ecologically and socially.
Alteration of streamflow and sediment transport by Cascades Diversion Dam will be eliminated and natural process will be restored eventually through the removal of the structure.
Expected benefits of restoring the natural hydrologic process may be difficult to quantify; however, our center believes that natural streamflow, sediment transport, channel migration, etc. have benefits above and beyond what would be easily measured within the system."
(Conservation Organization, Twain Harte, CA. #13-1)
"The Tuolumne County Community Development Department supports Alternative 2, Complete Dam Removal, as the preferred alternative under Section 101 of the National Environmental Policy Act.
For safety, aesthetic, biological, and cultural resource reasons, this dam should be removed to prevent potentially catastrophic damage from occurring should the dam fail.
The impacts that could result from dam failure are too significant to allow the dam to exist in its current condition.
Considering that the Cascades Diversion Dam is no longer serving its original purpose, this opportunity to restore the Merced River and prevent uncontrolled dam failure should not be missed.
While the project is located in Mariposa County, Tuolumne County supports actions by federal agencies that are in accordance with the Tuolumne County General Plan.
The proposed dam removal is supported by goals in the Safety Element, recreational Element, and the Conservation and Open Space Element in the General Plan."
(County Agency, Sonora, CA. #8-1)
"Alternative No. 2 clearly accomplishes best the purpose of the Cascades Diversion Dam removal Project, that is, to remove an unnatural obstruction on the Merced River and to restore the river's natural free-flowing condition.
As the goal of the Yosemite National Park General Management Plan is to return the Valley to its natural state, complete removal of the dam and its adjacent structures is vital to the health of the Merced River and Yosemite National Park."
(Individual, Victorville, CA. #6-1)
"Alternative 2 allows the status of this stretch of the river to be redesignated as Scenic rather than `Recreational'."
(Individual, Rowlett, TX. #5-3)
"While Alternative 3 meets, in part, some of the goals of this project, Alternative 2 is clearly the best choice.
Alternative 2 meets the following seven important goals of the various applicable management plans: General Management Plan (Reclaim priceless natural beauty, and Allow natural process to prevail), Merced River Plan (Protect and enhance river-related natural resources, and Protect and restore natural hydrological and geomorphic processes), Yosemite Valley Plan (Restore, protect and enhance the resources of Yosemite Valley, and Reduce traffic congestion."
(Individual, Rowlett, TX. #5-2)
"Alternative 2 will be the alternative the Council will recommend because of the potential for Dam failure in the future.
The effects of Dam failure would be more devastating than controlled removal of Dam to wildlife, gathering resources and archeological sites downstream and in the project area."
(Tribal Organization, Mariposa, CA. #18-1)
"The Biophilia Society is stating its support for Alternative 2: Complete dam Removal for the Cascades Diversion Dam removal Project.
We agree that this alternative fits the General Management Plan Goals, the Merced River Plan Goals, and the Yosemite Valley Plan Goals."
(Conservation Organization, Clovis, CA. #4-1)
Response: Numerous public comments stated preference for Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2, the alternative preferred by the National Park Service and the environmentally preferable alternative.
As directed by the National Environmental Policy Act, the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment considers a range of alternatives.
The alternatives provide a range of frameworks for managing the removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam, balancing natural and cultural resource preservation with visitor use to varying degrees.
20.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not pursue Alternative 1 (No Action) of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project which would retain the dam.
"While the Park Service is legally required to assess a `No Action' alternative, Alternative 1 clearly fails to meet the purpose and need of the project.
Selection of Alternative 1 would allow the risk of life and property to continue and is wholly unacceptable."
(Individual, Rowlett, TX. #5-1)
Response: Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2 has been identified as the environmentally preferable alternative and has been identified as the preferred alternative by the National Park Service.
The National Park Service does not intend to pursue Alternative 1, No Action.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would continue to degrade and would eventually fail.
Dam failure would likely occur during high-flow conditions, releasing large debris and sediments to the river and banks.
In addition, continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in the release of large debris.
Dam debris could damage natural, cultural, and scenic resources as well as recreation opportunities and park facilities downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
In addition, debris removal activities could further damage resources.
21.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not implement Alternative 3 of the Cascades Diversion Dam Project.
"Alternative No. 3 removes the dam but retains the intake structure as a viewing platform, a potentially congestive, and in any case unnecessary and unnatural tourist stop-off structure."
(Individual, Victorville, CA. #6-3)
Response: As directed by the National Environmental Policy Act, the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment considers a range of alternatives.
The alternatives provide a range of frameworks for managing the removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam, balancing natural and cultural resource preservation with visitor use to varying degrees.
Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2 has been identified as the environmentally preferable alternative and has been identified as the preferred alternative by the National Park Service.
The National Park Service does not intend to pursue Alternative 3, Partial Dam Removal.
Alternative 3 would be less sensitive than Alternative 2 to provisions of Section 101 of the National Environmental Policy Act because free flow would remain affected in the immediate area of the intake structure (retained as a viewing platform); therefore, Alternative 3 would not enhance the integrity of wetland and aquatic resources in the area to the same degree as Alternative 2.
The health and safety of park visitors would not be protected to the same degree as under Alternative 2, due to continued vehicle safety hazards.
Further, the river-viewing platform (and visitors using the platform) would be exposed to long-term geologic hazards.
Removal of the parking area to the north of the dam would eliminate a carpool/recreation access point in the project vicinity.
Resources, Generally
25.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should destroy the sand bar at the eastern end of Mirror Lake.
"I...feel the sand bar at the eastern end of Mirror Lake should be destroyed, even though it's natural phenomenon."
(Individual, Castro Valley, CA. #1-3)
Response: Potential actions at Mirror Lake are beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for a project at Mirror Lake.
Any plan or actions regarding Mirror Lake would be evaluated in a separate implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act.
26.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should provide quantitative analysis to support its conclusions of environmental impacts.
"The DEA fails to provide quantitative analysis to support its many conclusory determinations of beneficial and adverse environmental effects."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-4)
Response: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment includes both qualitative and quantitative analysis as appropriate.
For instance, the impact analysis for Alternatives 2 and 3 (Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences) describes the acreage of wetlands that could be affected by project activities (Wetlands analysis) and the number of truck trips that would be required for dam removal activities (Transportation analysis).
Some of the impact analysis topics summarize detailed technical data and studies that are referenced in the Environmental Assessment, and are thereby incorporated by reference.
Technical data and studies referenced in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are on file at Yosemite National Park and are included in the Administrative Record for the project.
29.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should prescribe additional mitigation measures to protect resources in the area during dam removal
"The area between the river and the rock wall (right bank) needs to be protected when the ramp for equipment to enter and exit is constructed.
Definition of the area is 12 feet from rock wall in location of exit ramp and continues east out of project area."
(Tribal Organization, Mariposa, CA. #18-2)
"There are two species of Oak trees on the left bank (across the river from roadway) by the existing concrete wall, which will need to be protected when removing wall."
(Tribal Organization, Mariposa, CA. #18-4)
Response: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Mitigation Measures Common to All Action Alternatives (Chapter II, Alternatives) includes several measures to address potential impacts to soils and vegetation within the project area.
These measures include, but are not limited to:
 Biological monitoring, erosion and sediment control, and use of fencing or other means to protect sensitive resources adjacent to work areas.
 Avoid damage to natural surroundings in and around the work limits.
Provide temporary barriers to protect existing trees, plants, and root zones, if necessary, as determined by vegetation management staff.
Trees and other vegetation shall not be removed, injured, or destroyed without prior written approval.
Ropes, cable, or fencing shall not be fastened to trees.
All existing resource protection fencing shall be left in place and protected from heavy equipment.
 Prepare and implement an erosion control plan.
 Confine all construction operations to specified work limits.
Specific work limits and exclusionary areas would be defined in the construction work plan, but would be confined to the smallest area possible.
Approximately 10 feet of the existing river-right stone wall would be temporarily removed to allow for equipment access to the river, and vegetation that is approximately 12 feet from the western end of the stone wall would be protected by the above measures.
The stone wall would be restored to existing conditions, using to the original stones, following dam removal.
The above measures would also address vegetation and the oaks (including a stand of tanbark oaks) located to the river-left of the dam.
Some small diameter trees (approximately 4 inches in diameter at breast height or less) could be affected by project activities.
However, large tanbark oaks would be retained and protected (see bullet 2 above).
In response to this comment, an additional mitigation is added to address this species specifically:
 Protect the mature tanbark oak (park rare species) that is growing upslope from the river-left dam abutment from impacts during removal of the abutment.
31.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should further analyze the environmental impacts of project implementation.
"It appears to us that the DEA exaggerates the likelihood of catastrophic dam failure.
What is the uncertainty associated with this prediction? What is the likelihood of a catastrophic dam failure during non-flood conditions and the associated uncertainty? What is the likelihood of a gradual dam failure as opposed to a catastrophic event? What would be the consequences of a gradual failure? Would this not cause less impact to the River than step function release of the accumulated sediment?" (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-11)
"The NPS has not adequately addressed nor disclosed to the public the cumulative and biological negative impacts to the ORVs, flora, fauna, and hydrology of this river.
The hydrology has nowhere been adequately studied or addressed."
(Conservation Organization, Email.
#22-3)
Response: As described under Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 1, No Action (Chapter II, Alternatives), dam failure would likely occur during or following a period of high flow and could be sudden, or could occur over a course of years or decades.
The rate of dam degradation and eventual failure can not be predicted and depends on a number of factors, such as level and frequency of high flow occurrences, amount of large debris washing downstream, or rockfall events.
If the region experiences several high flow periods, or an extremely large high flow event, dam degradation and failure would likely occur more quickly than if the region experiences relatively mild flow conditions.
Under non-flood conditions, catastrophic dam failure is not likely, but continued degradation would occur, periodically releasing dam debris (timber, concrete, and grouted rockfill) over time.
Catastrophic failure of the dam during a high flow event, and associated release of dam debris could result in large pieces of the dam structure restricting and diverting flows, leading to bank erosion or riverbank scour between the dam and Cascades Picnic Area and damage to natural, cultural, and social resources within the river and adjacent areas.
Until flow reduced sufficiently to allow the pieces to be removed from the river after dam failure, bank erosion would continue and possible threaten to expose and undermine resources, including utility lines located under El Portal Road.
Dam retrieval activities could be required between the dam and Cascades Picnic Area, requiring multiple ingress and egress points and use of heavy equipment, resulting in potential impacts to resources.
Gradual degradation of the dam over time would not likely result in the same amount of bank erosion as would occur following complete dam failure during high flow periods.
However, gradual degradation could also result in release of large debris that could damage downstream resources through scour or localized erosion, and through debris removal activities.
Potential impacts to natural resources associated with the proposed action are described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment includes both qualitative and quantitative analysis as appropriate.
For instance, the impact analysis for Alternatives 2 and 3 describes the acreage of wetlands that could be affected by project activities (Wetlands analysis).
Some of the impact analysis topics summarize detailed technical data and studies that are referenced in the Environmental Assessment, and are thereby incorporated by reference.
Technical studies include several hydrologic studies that have occurred over the past 14 years.
Technical data and studies referenced in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are on file at Yosemite National Park and are included in the Administrative Record for the project.
Compliance with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, including consistency with Outstandingly Remarkable Values, is a key responsibility of the National Park Service and is the primary Purpose of the proposed action (see Chapter II, Purpose and Need of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project).
The proposed action fully complies with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, as described in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter V, Merced Wild and Scenic River.
The effects of the proposed action on each of the Outstandingly Remarkable Values that apply to the project area are described in Chapter V, Merced Wild and Scenic River (and the associated Appendix B, Merced Wild and Scenic River Section 7 Determination).
27.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should implement the proposed mitigation measures for potential biological impacts on the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project.
"The proposed mitigation measures for potential biological impacts are also supported by the Tuolumne County wildlife Handbook."
(County Agency, Sonora, CA. #8-2)
Response: This comment is noted.
The National Park Service intends to fully comply with mitigations outlined in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment for the project.
Ecosystem Processes
32.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should establish indicators to determine when the river channel has fully stabilized following removal of the dam.
"In the description of the project to reconstruct Segment D of the El Portal Road on page E-4, it states that we will wait until the river channel has stabilized before design alternatives for the road are developed.
I was unable to find discussion of what indicators would be used to determine if the river channel had fully stabilized following removal of the dam.
In the description of Alternative 2 on page II-6 it states that the remaining river sediments would be transported downstream over time.
The term "over time" is very vague and could hamper us when we begin the design and compliance for the reconstruction of segment D of the El Portal Road.
I feel an indicator of what constitutes a stabilized river channel needs to be established."
(Individual, Email.
10-1)
Response: Determination of when stabilization of the Merced River has occurred within the project area following dam removal would likely involve monitoring by a fluvial geomorphologist or hydrogeologist who would observe: near complete removal of obvious reservoir deposits/sediments by equipment (during dam removal activities) and by the river (following dam removal), channel widths that are similar to the reach immediately upstream, constant slopes through the dam site, obvious reoccupation of the former channel (if apparent), absence of eroding embankments, and similar bed material gradation to the reach just upstream.
33.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should present a hydraulics study, prior to removal of the dam, of the river flow conditions before and after dam removal.
"Table B-1, page B-9 states that flood storage after removal of the dam would be increased; this does not appear to be an accurate statement.
Unless this is proven by proper analysis of the river channel, this statement should be removed."
(State Agency, Stockton, CA. #14-4)
"The DEA provides only qualitative analyses of the effects of fine sediment deposition resulting from dam removal.
Instead of providing quantitative descriptions, it assumes this effect will be negligible; since the removal will be performed during low flow periods and the subsequent high flows in succeeding months would transport the remaining fine sediments beyond the Wild and Scenic Portion of the River.
Suppose the succeeding months do not provide the anticipated increased flows.
Where will the fine sediments be deposited? What is the likely deposition pattern as a function of flow rate and particle size? The deposition of sediment in the calmer portions of the River--along highway 140 between El Portal and Briceburg is a cumulative effect of the project that must be analyzed in the EA." (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-7)
"Table III-1 presents data on turbidity measurements at Pohono Bridge and below Cascades Dam for five different dates.
No information is provided on the flow rates at the times of sampling.
It may be assumed, that the most recent sampling dates corresponded to increased flow rates.
Thus the lower turbidity values in the samples collected on 12/01/02 and 01/15/03 may be attributed to increased dilution at the higher flow rates.
There is a slight increase in turbidity (7%) in the sample taken below the dam on the 12/01/02 date when compared to that sampled at the bridge.
No attempt is made to determine whether this increase resulted from additional erosion before the impoundment or from mobilization of sediments in the pool.
An additional sample--taken just upstream of the pool--would have provided useful information.
During the reduced flow conditions that prevailed at the earlier sampling dates, the turbidity was less blew the Dam than at the bridge, indicating that some sediment settled in the pool.
What will be the increases in turbidity resulting from mobilization of the pool sediments and how long will they persist under the low flow conditions--anticipated during the removal operation?" (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-8)
"The DEA includes no hydrologic calculations of the intensity and scale of the turbulent stream.
Nor are there any calculations of the velocity profiles and boundary layer thickness adjacent to the banks during flood events.
Absent this sort of information, an informed public cannot develop a realistic appreciation of the consequences of the proposed dam removal."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-21)
"CalTrans sees no references to a Hydraulics Study of the present flow conditions or flow conditions with the proposed removal of the structure.
This would normally be a consideration prior to any removal of a dam or any significant structure within a watercourse such as this."
(State Agency, Stockton, CA. #14-3)
Response: In response to this comment, Table B-1 of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment has been revised.
The revised text is included in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Merced Wild and Scenic River Section 7 Determination attached to the Finding of No Significant Impacts for the proposed action.
Hydrologic studies are described and summarized in Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter II, Alternatives and Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment includes both qualitative and quantitative analysis as appropriate.
Hydrologic studies and detailed technical data and studies that are referenced in the Environmental Assessment are incorporated by reference.
Technical studies include several hydrologic studies that have occurred over the past 14 years.
Technical data and studies referenced in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are on file at Yosemite National Park and are included in the Administrative Record for the project.
Hydrologic studies include quantitative and qualitative analysis of sediments and potential deposition patterns.
As described in Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences, Alternative 1 - No Action, sediment deposition would occur in the reach between the dam and the Cascades Picnic Area.
Because less than 1% of the impounded material is finer than 0.07 millimeter in diameter, any turbidity impact to the river from release of this material would likely be small.
Fine-grained materials would be transported downstream some distance and would likely settle out and deposit in areas of low energy.
Downstream sediment transport and evolution of natural channel dynamics under the proposed action would be the same as under Alternative 1; however, the total amount of sediment available for downstream transport would be reduced.
Under lower flow conditions, sediment release from the impoundment area would occur more slowly and would not travel as far as under higher flow conditions (as described above, the sediment technical studies referenced in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment are on file at Yosemite National Park and are included in the Administrative Record for the project).
In addition, mitigation measures would be required under the proposed action, including an erosion control plan specifying measures to prevent erosion and sedimentation during project activities and compliance with Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board turbidity requirements (see Chapter II, Alternatives, Mitigation Measures Common to All Action Alternatives).
As part of mitigation implementation, turbidity monitoring would be required prior to, during, and following project activities.
Monitoring locations would be determined in consultation with the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board, and could include the monitoring location recommended by the commentor.
14.
Public Concern: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should not alter the free-flowing character of the Merced River.
"The [Wild and Scenic River Act] prohibits placement of rip/rap on the banks of a Wild and Scenic River.
The effort to sanitize the name of the activity by calling it a `bio-engineered bank stabilization system' does not change the fact that this is an effort to alter the `free-flowing' character of the river.
...
The El Portal Road is about 26 feet wide.
Comparison of this width--with the rep/rap width proposed in Figures II-3 and II-6--indicates that this rip/rap will extend about 50 feet into the River at the widest point.
This is unacceptable."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-14)
Response: The Wild and Scenic Rivers Act does not prohibit the placement of riprap.
However, it does require a process to ensure that any proposed riverbank stabilization would not have a direct and adverse effect on the values for which the river was designated, or the river's free flowing characteristics.
Bank protection is required along the north bank of the project area to protect the slope that supports the existing El Portal Road, a primary road into Yosemite National Park.
Without bank protection after removal of the dam, the base level of the river is expected to lower, and the foot of the slope that supports the existing El Portal Road would become undermined.
Section 7 of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 USC 1278) requires a rigorous process to ensure that any proposed riverbank stabilization would not have a direct and adverse effect on the values for which the river was designated, or the river's free-flowing characteristics.
The National Park Service documented the rigorous process used to evaluate the impact of the project on the free-flowing condition and the values for which the river was designated, see Appendix B - Merced Wild and Scenic River Section 7 Determination, in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment.
The Section 7 Determination concluded that the proposed action would enhance free-flow of the Merced River and would not have any direct and adverse effects on the Outstandingly Remarkable Values for which the river was designated a component of the Wild and Scenic Rivers System.
In addition, actions to protect El Portal Road would protect access to riverside recreation, an Outstandingly Remarkable Value of the Merced River.
The Merced River Plan designates areas immediately adjacent to the river channel as the "River Protection Overlay" because they are particularly important to the health and proper functioning of the river ecosystem.
Future actions within the River Protection Overlay to construct essential facilities such as primary roads must minimize impacts to the free-flowing condition of the river, linkages to tributary inflow and backwater areas, and contribution of woody debris to the river.
The amount of boulders and sediment required for bank protection would be the minimum required to stabilize and protect the slope from erosion.
The slope would not impede linkages to tributary inflows or backwater areas.
Native vegetation integrated into the slope would, in time, provide a source of woody debris to the Merced River.
The Wild and Scenic Rivers Act requires agencies to pay special attention to the use of riprap along a component of the Wild and Scenic Rivers System (16 USC 1283).
Riprap is defined in the Merced River Plan as a layer of large, durable fragments of broken rocks specially selected and graded, thrown together irregularly or fitted together to prevent erosion by waves or currents.
The National Park Service proposes an alternative to riprap, a bioengineered slope protection system to be installed on the north riverbank.
The slope would be constructed of ungrouted natural river boulders and native vegetation, designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks.
This system differs from riprap because it will not consist of selected and graded broken rocks, rather it will consist of natural ungraded river rock, integrated with the roots of vegetation.
The bioengineered slope protection system would minimize materials needed to stabilize the slope, integrate vegetation into the bank, provide habitat for riparian-dependent wildlife, and provide a source of large woody debris and shade.
While the bioengineered bank stabilization system would extend 50 feet from the edge of El Portal Road, the bioengineered bank stabilization system would follow the contour of the existing riverbank.
Water Resources
34.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should analyze and present the change in water temperature expected below the project site after dam removal.
"A possible result of dam removal would be a change in water temperature below the dam location.
The DEA makes no attempt to analyze whether this change would be an increase or decrease in temperature.
At present, the water temperature may increase below the dam as a result of insulation, or it may decrease as a result of evaporation from a larger exposed surface.
The DEA provides no data on the current temperature regime; nor does it provide quantitative analysis to support the expected temperature decrease."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-9)
Response: The proposed action would not reduce the tree canopy along this stretch of the Merced River and there is currently no significant water storage capacity behind the dam.
Therefore, it is not anticipated that removal of the dam under the proposed action would result in changes in water temperature or impacts to resources related to changes in water temperature.
Temperature readings taken above and below the dam on April 14, 2003 were the same at 6 degrees Celsius.
Vegetation (not rare, threatened or endangered)
35.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should analyze and disclose the impacts to vegetation of widening the El Portal Road to north at the project site in both Alternatives 2 and 3.
"We now arrive at the most serious objections to removal of the dam.
Under both these Alternatives [2 
The DEA fails to describe what vegetation management activities will be associated with this widening.
How many trees will be removed? What basal area? What is the Quadratic Mean Diameter (QMD) of those trees? What is their average age?" (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-13)
Response: Under the proposed action, El Portal Road would not be widened to the north.
During project activities, El Portal Road would be temporarily realigned approximately 30 feet to the north through an existing paved parking area and previously disturbed earthen embankment (see Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Figure II-3).
Traffic would be detoured to the north and staging for equipment access and storage would be immediately adjacent to the mainstem of the Merced River.
No trees would be removed for the traffic detour.
Following dam removal, and revegetation and bank stabilization, all dam-removal-related materials and equipment would be removed from the site.
El Portal Road would be realigned to its former location and the paved parking area would be returned to its pre-removal state.
Cultural Resources
15.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should nominate the Cascades diversion dam and intake structure with screens to the National Register of Historic Places.
"Under the `Introduction' section of Chapter I, the DEA notes: `Cascades Diversion Dam and intake structure with screens were determined to be eligible for nomination to the National Register of Historic Places in 1982....'
Why did the Park Service not make this nomination? This was prior to the designation (1987) of the River as Wild and Scenic; therefore the argument--that removal of the dam would restore the free-flowing condition desired by the WSRA--was not pertinent at that time.
What is the process for nominating an eligible feature to the Register? Must an Agency, an organization, or an individual do this? Stipulation 8 in the MOA seems to indicate that anyone can make such a nomination.
Is there any time limit after eligibility is determined?" (Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-18)
Response: As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter III, Affected Environment (Cultural Resources, Euro-Americans) the Yosemite Hydroelectric Power Plant and associated structures (including the dam) is listed in the national Register of Historic Places, significant for engineering.
The National Park Service, National Register of Historic Places website (http://www.cr.nps.gov/nr/listing.htm) includes a description of the National Register listing process, criteria for nomination, and timeline for the process.
Properties are nominated to the National Register by the State Historic Preservation officer of the State in which the property is located, by the Federal Preservation Officer for properties under Federal ownership or control, or by the Tribal Preservation Officer if the property is on tribal lands.
Upon submission to the National Park Service, a decision on whether to list the property is made within 45 days.
36.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should disclose any compliance actions, per agreements with the California State Historic Preservation Officer, protecting historic elements of the Cascades diversion dam.
"[Regarding the Cascades Dam Removal environmental assessment and National Park Service compliance with stipulations in the Memorandum of Agreement with the California State Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation and a letter to the State Historic Preservation Officer indicating that the Section 106 consultation process is complete, the Yosemite Area Audubon] cannot find any other references to these stipulations in the DEA.
When were the stipulated items relocated to the Fresno Museum? When was the `scaled-model' constructed? Where is it displayed? At a minimum, the DEA should inform the reader about the locations of these items, so that compliance can be confirmed."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-5)
Response: The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter VI, Consultation and Coordination includes a summary of the Agency Consultation conducted with the California State Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation.
This section also describes actions the National Park Service has undertaken in compliance with the 1986 Memorandum of Agreement with the California State Historic Preservation Officer and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation and Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, as amended, including the preparation of Historic American Engineering Report documentation, the submittal of archival photographs and narrative to the State Historic Preservation Officer and the Fresno Metropolitan Museum, and the development of an accurate scale model of the entire Merced River hydroelectric system.
The scale model is also located at the Fresno Metropolitan Museum and is currently located in the basement of the museum, along with components of the hydroelectric system.
Agency consultation referenced in the Environmental Assessment is on file at Yosemite National Park and is included in the Administrative Record for the project.
The Administrative Record includes a letter from the Fresno Metropolitan Museum (dated April 28, 2003) stating that the equipment required under the Memorandum of Understanding, including the scale model, was taken into possession by the Fresno Metropolitan in August of 1987.
A copy of the letter is attached to this Summary of Comments and Responses report.
Recreation
30.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should consider construction of a trail along the river below the Cascades diversion dam.
"Perhaps someday there will be a trail made along the river below the dam to allow viewing that is now difficult except for glances."
(Individual, Temecula, CA. #2-3)
Response: Designation and construction of a trail along the Merced River bank in the vicinity of the dam is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for trail construction.
Any plan to construct trails would be considered a specific project and would be evaluated in a subsequent implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act.
37.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should rebuild Upper and Lower River campgrounds.
"The two campgrounds [Upper and Lower River) should be restored so that more visitors may cherish the Yosemite experience.
I'm sure that the fringes of the campground could be protected from the Merced River with dikes or some barriers."
(Individual, Castro Valley, CA. #1-2)
Response: Restoration of campgrounds within Yosemite National Park is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment does not provide a separate planning vehicle for campground restoration.
Any plan to restore campgrounds would be considered a specific project and would be evaluated in a subsequent implementation plan consistent with the National Environmental Policy Act.
Visitor Services
38.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should not construct a viewing platform at the Cascades Diversion Dam project site.
"For safety reasons a platform should not be made."
(Individual, Temecula, CA. #2-1)
"We feel that `partial' (Alternative #3) leaves a platform for viewing' that will cause an unsafe `traffic' situation with visitors crossing road from the existing parking area to look at the river etc."
(Individual, Mariposa, CA. #9-2)
Response: As directed by the National Environmental Policy Act, the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment considers a range of alternatives.
The alternatives provide a range of frameworks for managing the removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam, preserving natural and cultural resource preservation and allowing for visitor use to varying degrees.
Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2 has been identified as the environmentally preferable alternative and has been identified as the preferred alternative by the National Park Service.
The National Park Service does not intend to pursue Alternative 3, Partial Dam Removal.
Alternative 3 would be less sensitive than Alternative 2 to provisions of Section 101 of the National Environmental Policy Act because free flow would remain affected in the immediate area of the intake structure (retained as a viewing platform); therefore, Alternative 3 would not enhance the integrity of wetland and aquatic resources in the area to the same degree as Alternative 2.
The health and safety of park visitors would not be protected to the same degree as under Alternative 2, due to continued vehicle safety hazards.
Further, the river-viewing platform (and visitors using the platform) would be exposed to long-term geologic hazards.
Removal of the parking area to the north of the dam would eliminate a carpool/recreation access point in the project vicinity.
39.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should eliminate the parking area on the north side of the El Portal Road as part of the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project.
"Our only concern is the post-project parking plan related to the existing parking north of the El Portal road and east of the diversion dam.
It is not clear if the future and nature of this parking area is included under the Cascades project or will be clarified in the El Portal Road project.
In either case, we would like to see the elimination of this parking area due to the congested traffic situation caused by the intersection of the Big Oak Flat Road and Highway 140.
Eliminating parking and pulling-out moves by vehicles would enhance the safety of the intersection."
(Conservation Organization, Clovis, CA. #4-4)
Response: It is the preference of the National Park Service to retain the parking lot north of El Portal Road at the El Portal Road/Big Oak Flat Road intersection under the proposed section for use by visitors for carpooling or orientation to park destinations, and for visitors with disabled visitors.
The National Park Service would also prefer to retain the parking lot for use during winter as a location for putting on or removing tire chains and as a snowplow turnaround, for equipment staging and traffic control area for road closure activities, and for equipment staging for nearby maintenance operations, such as clearing landslide debris.
The parking lot has room for approximately five cars and does not contribute significantly to traffic congestion that may occur at the El Portal Road/Big Oak Flat Road intersection.
40.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should reassess the risks associated with retention of the dam as a reason for dam removal.
"In both the ES and Chapter 1, the DEA state: `Cascades Diversion Dam is classified as a high-hazard structure (USBR 1997)....'
In 1997 the U.S. Bureau of Reclamation classified the dam as a high-hazard structure.
Nevertheless, the dam withstood the floods of 1982/83 and 1997 without suffering a catastrophic failure.
The surface area of the pool is approximately 50,000 [square feet].
The dam height is 17 ft. Assuming a pool the shape of a quarter ellipsoid, the volume would be TT*(500*92*17)/3 = 614,181 [cubic feet] = 22.750 [cubic yards]
The sediment volume is estimated to be 15,000 [cubic yards] leaving 7,750 [cubic yards]
Assuming the sedimentary bed is close to the surface at the confluence of the River and the pool, leads to an estimate bed height below the dam of 7 ft.
The total force on the dam is about 603 tons.
On average, this is only about 386 pounds per square foot, which does not appear to be excessive.
When the river rises due to flood conditions, the forces on the dam increase.
At a volume flow rate (Q) of 35,000 CFS the velocity (V) is: V = (64.4*h) [to the 1/2 power], here `h' is the height of the stream above the dam.
Q n= 184*h*V = 184*8.025*(h) [to the 3/2 power] = 35,000 From this it follows that: h= (35,000/(184*8.025))[to the 2/3 power]
The total force on the dam would be 1370 tons or an average of 876 pounds per square foot (2.27 times the non-flood pressure).
It appears to us that the DEA exaggerates the likelihood of catastrophic dam failure."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-10)
"Doomsday predictions about the consequences of not taking an action are not appropriate arguments for taking a proposed action.
Zero-risk is an unattainable condition.
There is no guarantee that some unforeseen occurrence--during the dam removal operation--will not result in injury or fatality to a worker on the project."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-12)
"The DEA speaks of the risk that some person may be injured by falling from the dam--as contributing to the `need' to remove the dam.
How often since the shutdown of the powerhouse, have people walked on the dam? What is the probability of such an occurrence as compared to the risk of being injured by a rock fall or falling from some other place in the Park? If a catastrophic dam failure is more likely to occur under flood conditions, what is the probability that someone will be `recreating' on the rocks below the dam at that time? Reviewing this portion of the DEA, one might almost conclude that the Dam is a WMD."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-17)
Response: As discussed in the Environmental Assessment in Chapter I, Purpose and Need, the National Park Service proposes to remove Cascades Diversion Dam because the dam structure is failing, the dam is in such a debilitated state that it no longer serves its functional purpose, and removal of the dam would restore the river's natural free-flowing condition in this river segment consistent with the Wild and Scenic River guidance provided in the Merced Wild and Scenic River Comprehensive Management Plan.
Cascades Diversion Dam is classified as a high-hazard structure (USBR 1997).
While the dam withstood the 1997 flood, the dam sustained significant damage during the flood, and due to continuing deterioration associated with age.
As described under Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 1, No Action (Chapter II, Alternatives), dam failure would likely occur during or following a period of high flow and could be sudden, or could occur over a course of years or decades.
The rate of dam degradation and eventual failure can not be predicted and depends on a number of factors, such as level and frequency of high flow occurrences, amount of large debris washing downstream, or rockfall events.
If the region experiences several high flow periods, or an extremely large high flow event, dam degradation and failure would likely occur more quickly than if the region experiences relatively mild flow conditions.
Under non-flood conditions, catastrophic dam failure is not likely, but continued degradation would occur, periodically releasing dam debris (timber, concrete, and grouted rockfill).
Catastrophic failure of the dam during a high flow event, and associated release of dam debris could result in large pieces of the dam structure restricting and diverting flows, leading to bank erosion or riverbank scour between the dam and Cascades Picnic Area and damage to natural, cultural, and social resources within the river and adjacent areas.
Until flow reduced sufficiently to allow the pieces to be removed from the river after dam failure, bank erosion would continue and possible threaten to expose and undermine resources, including utility lines located under El Portal Road.
Dam retrieval activities could be required between the dam and Cascades Picnic area, requiring multiple ingress and egress points and use of heavy equipment, resulting in potential impacts to resources.
Gradual degradation of the dam over time would not likely result in the same amount of bank erosion as would occur following complete dam failure during high flow periods.
However, gradual degradation could also result in release of large debris that could damage downstream resources through scour or localized erosion, and through debris removal activities.
The National Park Service would follow Best Management Practices and Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) guidelines during proposed dam removal to ensure protection of public health and safety.
47.
Public Concern: The National Park Service should retain the Cascades Diversion Dam.
"There may be some advantages to retaining the dam.
It could serve as an interpretive example for what should not be done to a river.
Its ultimate failure would also be an example of our species inability to control natural phenomena."
(Conservation Organization, Mariposa, CA. #23-23)
Response: The proposed action includes interpretive displays and information regarding the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project.
Permanent interpretive displays could also be included within the Park; however, permanent interpretive displays are beyond the scope of this project.
Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment Alternative 2 has been identified as the environmentally preferable alternative and has been identified as the preferred alternative by the National Park Service.
The National Park Service does not intend to pursue Alternative 1, No Action.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would continue to degrade and would eventually fail.
Dam failure would likely occur during high-flow conditions, releasing large debris and sediments to the river and banks.
In addition, continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in the release of large debris.
Dam debris could damage natural, cultural, and scenic resources as well as recreation opportunities and park facilities downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
In addition, debris removal activities could further damage resources.
Transportation
41.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should analyze and disclose effects of traffic delays during dam removal on scheduled YARTS public transit service.
"While this project would produce no long-term adverse impacts to vehicle travel to and from Yosemite National Park, the scheduled YARTS Public Transit Service could be impacted during construction.
During the five month construction period outlined in Alternative Two, traffic delays of five or more minutes could occur at various times.
With public confidence in the schedule of a transit system being of upmost importance, delays that can be avoided through planning by the contractor and National Park Service are primary in the day to day scheduling of construction activities.
This should be acknowledged in this report."
(State Agency, Stockton, CA. #14-5)
Response: As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment (Chapter II, Alternatives), the proposed action includes a traffic detour immediately north of El Portal Road north of the dam.
The existing stop sign may be relocated temporarily to an appropriate location to meet the needs of the proposed three-way stop.
However, this may be modified as necessary to minimize traffic delays.
As identified in Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences, Alternative 2 - Complete Dam Removal, transportation, temporary delays could occur at the dam and from vehicles turning onto and from El Portal Road at the entrance to Pohono Quarry.
The proposed action includes mitigation measures to address potential traffic delays, including implementation of a traffic control plan (advanced warning signs, flaggers to direct traffic, and advanced notification of visitors about the location, timing, and duration of dam removal activities).
Upon completion of this project, the temporary signs would be removed and traffic conditions would be as they were prior to commencing project activities.
42.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should analyze the potential for the roadway retaining structure and rock wall being washed out by high water at the project site after removal of the dam, causing road failure.
"So, when you remove that old dam, that river during the next high water is going to do what it wants to do.
The sand and small rock is going to go downstream and that river channel is going to wash down as deep as it wants to go.
The retaining structure and the rock wall will likely become undermined and slide into the river and there goes about 500 feet of your road."
(Individual, Email.
#7-3)
Response: As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment, Chapter II, Alternatives (Alternative 2: Compete Dam Removal [Preferred]), following dam removal the river is expected to cut a channel through the remaining impounded sediments, narrowing and deepening the river channel.
The river would divide into a river-right and river-left channel around the exiting island above the dam site.
The decrease in riverbed elevation would necessitate the placement of slope protection on the river-right side of the channel.
As shown on Environmental Assessment Figure II-5 and pages II-12 through II-15 (Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup), a bioengineered slope protection system would be installed, resulting in a sloped embankment with trees, native vegetation, and boulders that would be designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks to the extent possible.
The bioengineered bank projection system is included as part of the project because the intake structure is located at a transition area between two different types of embankment slopes (see Environmental Assessment Figure II-5).
The riverbank, and the existing El Portal Road and utilities within the roadway, in this area would be particularly susceptible to erosion following dam removal without stabilization.
The proposed slope protection would enable water flow to transition through upstream and downstream embankments while protecting the riverbanks.
The bioengineered slope protection would include native river rock/boulders extracted during dam removal.
43.
Public Concern: The Environmental Assessment for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should examine the potential for the 5 year vegetation restoration period specified to hamper efforts for designing road reconstruction before the 5 year period is passed.
"The last sentence in the second paragraph on page II-14 gives an indicator of successful vegetation restoration over a 5 year period of time.
I am concerned that a statement such as this may hamper any effort to design road reconstruction before the 5 year period has passed."
(Individual, Email.
#10-2)
Response: As indicated on page II-21 of the Environmental Assessment the National Park Service intends to remove Cascades Diversion Dam, let natural processes prevail through this reach of the Merced River, and allow the river to stabilize.
Potential future improvement of El Portal Road is beyond the scope of this project.
The specific actions to be implemented under any of the alternatives pertain only to the Cascades Diversion Dam.
If the National Park Service decides to proceed with the El Portal Road Improvement Project - Cascades Dam to Pohono Bridge, potential future designs will need to comply with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act as well as other legislation and park planning documents.
Potential future improvement of El Portal Road is beyond the scope of this project.
44.
Public Concern: The Finding of No Significant Impact for the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project should clarify the placement of the stop sign when the road is diverted into the present parking lot.
"Figure II-3 and Page II-10 Setup-- Where will the stop sign be placed when the road is diverted into the present parking area? Will it be on the El Portal Road of Big Oak flat Road? The drawing makes it appear as though the traffic going uphill on the El Portal Road should come to a stop because of the configuration of the `T' intersection."
(Individual, Email.
#10-4)
Response: As described in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment (Chapter II, Alternatives), the proposed action includes a traffic detour immediately north of El Portal Road north of the dam.
The existing stop sign may be relocated temporarily to an appropriate location to meet the needs of the proposed three-way stop.
However, this may be modified as necessary to minimize traffic delays.
In addition, the proposed action includes implementation of a traffic control plan, with use of flaggers to direct traffic through the project area during removal activities.
Upon completion of this project, the temporary signs would be removed and traffic conditions would be as they were prior to commencing project activities.
[image002.jpg]
